Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 4
LOCAL JUNIOR COLLEGES

23-60-401 to 23-60-406. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire part repealed, p. 788, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 4 was numbered as article 26 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 4 prior to its repeal in 1975, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For present provisions concerning local district colleges, see part 2 of article 71 of this title 23.